Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 16. Quebec 1 Missile Alert Facility

§ 36-8-1601.
Authorizing lease or use of Quebec 1 missile alert facility; declaration of Quebec 1 missile alert facility state historic site.

The legislature authorizes the department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the governor and the attorney general, to negotiate a lease or use agreement for the Quebec 1 missile alert facility from the United States department of the air force to allow the department of state parks and cultural resources to operate the facility as a historic site. Any lease or use agreement may include a provision that provides facilities for volunteer firemen to store equipment and vehicles.

Before entering into any lease or use agreement under subsection (a) of this section:

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall hold a public hearing to receive input on how operating the facility as a historic site may affect adjacent landowners and on the advisability of proceeding with the lease or use agreement;

An environmental baseline survey pursuant to Air Force Instruction 32-7066 shall be completed. The survey shall identify the nature and magnitude of environmental contamination of the property. The survey shall include a search of all available historic and operational records and survey reports, collection of samples as appropriate and inspections;

Upon completion of the hearing and the survey, the department of state parks and cultural resources shall report the findings of the hearing and the results of the survey to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee and the governor. After receiving the findings of the hearing and the report under this subsection, the governor may authorize the execution of the lease or use agreement negotiated under subsection (a) of this section.

If the governor determines that it is in the best interests of the state to take ownership of the Quebec 1 missile alert facility, the governor is authorized to negotiate the terms of the transfer. Negotiations shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of whether the state may acquire by way of donation equipment and accessories from the United States department of the air force used when the Quebec 1 missile alert facility was in full operation or used in other related or nonrelated military operations to enhance the experience of the historic site, including retired missile shells and retired military aircraft, vehicles and arms. A transfer under this subsection shall be in accordance with the following:

Prior to any transfer, the department of state parks and cultural resources shall hold a public hearing to receive input on how operating the facility as a historic site may affect adjacent landowners and on the advisability of proceeding with the transfer. Upon completion of the hearing, the department of state parks and cultural resources shall report the findings of the hearing to the governor;

The legislature authorizes the governor to accept the terms of the transfer provided that:

The governor considers the findings reported under paragraph (i) of this subsection and determines it is in the best interests of the state to take ownership of the facility;

The governor reports the terms of the transfer to the joint appropriations committee prior to the transfer;

The terms of the transfer include a provision requiring the United States department of the air force or other appropriate agency to retain liability for all environmental, closure and reclamation obligations that exist as of the date of the potential transfer.

Upon transfer of land, the Quebec 1 missile alert facility is declared to be a state historic site and shall be known as the “Quebec 1 missile alert facility state historic site”.

History.

2015 ch. 103, § 1, effective March 3, 2015; 2017 ch. 84, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in the introductory language of (c), substituted “A” for “Prior to any” and added “shall be in accordance with the following” to the last sentence; in (c)(i), added “Prior to any transfer” at the beginning of the paragraph; in (c)(ii), rewrote the introductory language and added (A) through (C).

Laws 2017, ch. 84, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 103, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 3, 2015.

§ 36-8-1602.
Administration; fees.

Upon the execution of a use or lease agreement under this article, the department of state parks and cultural resources is authorized to administer, operate and maintain the historic site in accordance with the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, as amended, and the programmatic agreement between the United States department of the air force and the department of state parks and cultural resources. The historic site shall be open to the public for a seasonal period as determined by the department of state parks and cultural resources.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of state parks and cultural resources may impose an admissions fee in excess of fees charged for admissions to other state parks and sites to fund necessary expenses incurred for development, operations, personnel and maintenance of the Quebec 1 missile alert facility. Funds collected from the admissions fee shall be deposited in a separate account and are continuously appropriated to the department to pay expenses authorized by this subsection. The remaining funds collected from the admissions fee at the end of the fiscal year may be deposited in the state parks account and expended in accordance with W.S. 36-4-121(h). Revenues and expenditures under this subsection for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years shall be reported within the department’s biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

.

History.

2015 ch. 103, § 1, effective March 3, 2015; 2018 ch. 43, § 1, effective March 10, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), substituted “under this article, the department” for “under this section, the department” in the first sentence; and added (b).

Laws 2018, ch. 43, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 43, § 2, provides: “The department of state parks and cultural resources shall report on the operations of the Quebec 1 missile alert facility to the joint appropriations committee and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee on or before November 1, 2020. The report shall indicate whether the net proceeds from admissions fees collected during the previous two (2) fiscal years meet the expenses incurred during the same period.”